Washington statutes.
RCW 18.89.010

Legislative findings—Insurance coverage not mandated.

The legislature finds that in order to safeguard life, health, and to promote public welfare, a person practicing or offering to practice respiratory care as a respiratory care practitioner in this state shall be required to submit evidence that he or she is qualified to practice, and shall be licensed as provided. The settings for these services may include, health facilities licensed in this state, clinics, home care, home health agencies, physicians' offices, public or community health services, and services provided through telemedicine to patients in these settings. Nothing in this chapter shall be construed to require that individual or group policies or contracts of an insurance carrier, health care service contractor, or health maintenance organization provide benefits or coverage for services and supplies provided by a person certified under this chapter.

[ 2021 c 114 s 1; 1997 c 334 s 1; 1987 c 415 s 1.]

NOTES:

Effective date—2021 c 114: "This act takes effect July 1, 2022." [ 2021 c 114 s 6.]

Effective dates—1997 c 334: "(1) Sections 5, 9, and 10 of this act are necessary for the immediate preservation of the public peace, health, or safety, or support of the state government and its existing public institutions, and take effect July 1, 1997.

(2) Sections 1 through 4, 6 through 8, and 11 through 15 of this act take effect July 1, 1998." [ 1997 c 334 s 16.]